Illinois, session 104th, HB3996.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Human Services for a grant to 7the Illinois Prison Project for the purposes of legal support, 8representation, and education for incarcerated persons in the 9Illinois Department of Corrections. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112025.